bg-BG: Материал за поддържка на растения: Бамбук; Керамика; Кокосови влакна; Бетон; Fiberglass; Стъкло; Метал; Пластмаса; Смола; Камък; Теракота; Дърво; Други
zh-TW: 植物支撐材料: 竹子; 陶瓷; 椰殼纖維; 實心; 玻璃纖維; 玻璃; 金屬; 塑膠; 樹脂; 石頭; 紅陶; 木材; 其他
pl: Materiał podpory dla roślin: Bambus; Ceramika; Kokos; Beton; Włókno szklane; Szkło; Metal; Tworzywo sztuczne; Żywica; Kamień; Terakota; Drewno; Inne
fi: Kasvien tukimateriaali: Bambu; Keraaminen; Kookos; Betoni; Lasikuitu; Lasi; Metalli; Muovi; Hartsi; Kivi; Terrakotta; Puu; Muu
ro-RO: Material de suport pentru plante: Bamboo; Ceramic; Cocos; Beton; Fibră de sticlă; Sticlă; Metal; Plastic; Rășină; Piatră; Teracotă; Lemn; Altele
en: Plant support material: Bamboo; Ceramic; Coir; Concrete; Fiberglass; Glass; Metal; Plastic; Resin; Stone; Terracotta; Wood; Other
nl: Materiaal ondersteuning voor planten: Bamboe; Keramiek; Coir; Beton; Glasvezel; Glas; Metaal; Plastic; Hars; Steen; Terracotta; Hout; Andere
de: Pflanzenträgermaterial: Bambus; Keramik; Kokos; Beton; Fiberglas; Glas; Metall; Kunststoff; Harz; Stein; Terrakotta; Holz; Sonstiges
lt-LT: Augalus prilaikanti medžiaga: Bambukas; Keramika; Kokoso pluoštas; Betonas; Stiklo pluoštas; Stiklas; Metalas; Plastikas; Derva; Akmuo; Terakota; Mediena; Kita
ru: Материал для поддержки растений: Бамбук; Керамика; Кокосовое волокно; Бетон; Стекловолокно; Стеклянные; Металл; Пластик; Смола; Камень; Терракота; Дерево; Другой
hu: Növénytámasz anyaga: Bambusz; Kerámia; Kókuszrost; Beton; Üveggyapot; Üveg; Fém; Műanyag; Gyanta; Kő; Égetett agyag; Fa; Egyéb
da: Planteunderstøttelsesmateriale: Bambus; Keramik; Kokos; Beton; Glasfiber; Glas; Metal; Plast; Harpiks; Sten; Terracotta; Træ; Andet
nb: Plantestøttemateriale: Bambus; Keramikk; Kokosfiber; Betong; Glassfiber; Glass; Metall; Plast; Harpiks; Stein; Terracotta; Trevirke; Annet
sl-SI: Podporni material za rastline: Bambus; Keramika; Kokosova vlakna; Beton; Steklena vlakna; Steklo; Kovina; Plastika; Smola; Kamen; Terakota; Les; Drugo
pt-BR: Material de suporte para plantas: Bambu; Cerâmica; Coir; Concreto; Fibra de vidro; Vidro; Metal; Plástico; Resina; Pedra; Terracota; Madeira; Outro
th: วัสดุที่ใช้ทำอุปกรณ์พยุงต้นไม้: ไผ่; เซรามิก; มะพร้าว; คอนกรีต; ไฟเบอร์กลาส; แก้ว; โลหะ; พลาสติก; เรซิน; หิน; ดินเผา; ไม้; อื่นๆ
vi: Vật liệu giàn trồng cây: Tre; Gốm; Xơ dừa; Bê tông; Sợi thủy tinh; Thủy tinh; Kim loại; Nhựa; Nhựa resin; Đá; Đất nung; Gỗ; Khác
ko: 식물 지지대 재료: 대나무; 세라믹; 코이어; 콘크리트; 유리 섬유; 유리; 금속; 플라스틱; 수지; 석재; 테라코타; 목재; 기타
cs: Materiál podpěry pro rostliny: Bambus; Keramika; Kokos; Beton; Skelná vata; Sklo; Kov; Plast; Pryskyřice; Kámen; Terakota; Dřevo; Jiné
el: Υλικό στήριξης φυτών: Μπαμπού; Κεραμικό; Ίνες κοκοφοίνικα; Σκυρόδεμα; Υαλοβάμβακας; Γυαλί; Μέταλλο; Πλαστικό; Ρητίνη; Πέτρα; Τερακότα; Ξύλο; Άλλο
pt-PT: Material de suporte para plantas: Bambu; Cerâmica; Coir; Betão; Fibra de vidro; Vidro; Metal; Plástico; Resina; Pedra; Terracota; Madeira; Outro
es: Material del tutor para plantas: Bambú; Cerámica; Fibra de coco; Hormigón; Fibra de vidrio; Vidrio; Metal; Plástico; Resina; Piedra; Terracotta; Madera; Otros
zh-CN: 植物支撑材料: 竹子; 陶瓷制品; 椰壳纤维; 混凝土; 玻璃纤维; 玻璃; 金属; 塑料; 树脂; 石头; 陶瓦; 木头; 其他
it: Materiale di supporto per piante: Bamboo; Ceramica; Coir; Calcestruzzo; Vetroresina; Vetro; Metallo; Plastica; Resina; Pietra; Terracotta; Legno; Altro
tr: Bitki destek malzemesi: Bambu; Seramik; Hindistan cevizi; Beton; Fiberglas; Cam; Metal; Plastik; Reçine; Taş; Pişmiş toprak; Ahşap; Diğer
sv: Växtstöd - material: Bambu; Keramisk; Kokos; Betong; Glasfiber; Glas; Metall; Plast; Harts; Sten; Terrakotta; Trä; Övrigt
sk-SK: Podporný materiál pre rastliny: Bambus; Keramika; Kokosové vlákno; Betón; Sklolaminát; Sklo; Kov; Plast; Živica; Kameň; Terakota; Drevo; Iné
ja: プラントサポート材料: バンブー; セラミック; コアー; コンクリート; ガラス繊維; ガラス; 金属; プラスチック; レジン; 石; テラコッタ; 木材; その他
hr-HR: Potporni materijal za biljke: Bambus; Keramika; Kokosovo vlakno; Beton; Stakloplastika; Staklo; Metal; Plastika; Smola; Kamen; Terakota; Drvo; Ostalo
fr: Matériau du support pour plantes: Bambou; Céramique; Coco; Béton; Fibre de verre; Verre; Métal; Plastique; Résine; Pierre; Terracotta; Bois; Autre